Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.110

Recognizances before district judge or magistrate—Forfeiture—Action.

All recognizances taken and forfeited before any district judge or magistrate, shall be forthwith certified to the clerk of the superior court of the county; and it shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney to proceed at once by action against all the persons bound in such recognizances, and in all forfeited recognizances whatever, or such of them as the prosecuting attorney may elect to proceed against.

[ 1987 c 202 s 165; Code 1881 s 1166; 1873 p 230 s 215; 1854 p 128 s 175; RRS s 2234. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 1936; 1873 p 397 s 235; 1863 p 390 s 216; 1859 p 141 s 185; 1854 p 109 s 43; RRS s 1965, now codified as RCW 10.16.190.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.